North Dakota, session 69, SB2313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 38-08-04.12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
38-08-04.12. Reclamation of land disturbed by oil and gas activity.
1. Any land disturbed by construction of well sites, treating plants, saltwater handling
facilities, access roads, underground gathering pipelines and associated facilities, and
from remediation of leaks or spills within the jurisdiction of the commission shallmust
be reclaimed as close as practicable to its original condition as it existed before the
construction of the well site or other disturbance. Suitable plant growth material
disturbed for the construction of well sites, treating plants, saltwater handling facilities,
or access roads must be documented and preserved .
2. The commission, with the consent of the appropriate government land manager or
surface owner, may waive the requirement of reclamation of the site and access road
after a well is plugged or treating plant or saltwater handling facility is
decommissioned. The commission shall record documentation of the waiver with the
recorder of the county in which the site or road is located.
2.3. This section may not be construed to require removal of a properly reclaimed reserve
pit or a properly abandoned underground gathering pipeline.
3.4. A person may not bring a legal proceeding under this section, unless the person has
exhausted all administrative remedies.
Page No. 1 25.1310.02000